Maine, session 132, LD172.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §1512 is enacted to read:
§1512. Missing persons list
In cooperation with appropriate law enforcement agencies, the Bureau of State Police
shall establish by December 31, 2026 and maintain a publicly accessible website that lists
all open missing persons cases in the State. The website must contain details regarding each
missing person in the State that include, but are not limited to, the missing person's
demographics, photograph, circumstances of disappearance and last known location and
any additional information that may help in locating or identifying the missing person. The
website must be updated, at a minimum, once every month to include any new missing
person's information as required by this section.
Sec. 2. Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police to convene
working group. The Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police shall convene
a working group to review best practices for investigating missing persons cases in the
State, determining the feasibility of implementing those best practices in a training module
in the Maine Criminal Justice Academy's curriculum, reviewing the effectiveness of the
Silver Alert Program under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 25, section 2202 and
identifying ways to improve the Silver Alert Program. The working group must include the
following members:
1. The Commissioner of Public Safety, or the commissioner's designee;
2. The Chief of the State Police, or the chief's designee;
3. The Chief Medical Examiner, or the chief's designee;
4. A representative from the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife, Bureau of
Warden Service;
5. The Director of the Maine Criminal Justice Academy, or the director's designee;
Page 1 - 132LR0397(05)

6. A representative from a statewide association representing sheriffs;
7. A representative from a statewide association representing chiefs of police;
8. A representative from a statewide volunteer association specializing in search and
rescue;
9. A representative from an organization that specializes in maintaining a missing
persons list;
10. A family member of a missing person; and
11. A representative from each of the federally recognized Indian tribes, nations or
bands in the State, appointed by the representative's respective tribe, nation or band.
By December 3, 2025, the bureau shall submit a report that includes the findings and
recommendations of the working group, including suggested legislation, for presentation
to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public Safety. The committee
may submit legislation based on the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for technology costs to establish the publicly
accessible website.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,139 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,139 $0
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,229 $0
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $2,229 $0
Page 2 - 132LR0397(05)